District of Columbia statutes.
42-1122

Collected moneys to be deposited in United States Treasury.

All moneys collected under this chapter shall be deposited in the Treasury of the United States to the credit of the General Fund of the District of Columbia.; provided, that 15% of the monies collected under this chapter shall be deposited into the Housing Production Trust Fund established by § 42-2802.

History

Mar. 2, 1962, 76 Stat. 17, Pub. L. 87-408, title III, § 322
Apr. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-114, § 502(b), 49 DCR 1468
Mar. 13, 2004, D.C. Law 15-105, § 74(b), 51 DCR 881

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-942.
1973 Ed., § 45-742.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 14-114 substituted “General Fund of the District of Columbia; provided, that 15% of the monies collected under this chapter shall be deposited into the Housing Production Trust Fund established by § 42-2802” for “General Fund of the District of Columbia”.
D.C. Law 15-105 validated previously made technical corrections.